Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1174XS (4) 91 th/jh S.F. 437 Section 1. Section 68B.5A, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. A person who is subject to the requirements of subsection 3 1 shall not do any of the following within two years after the 4 termination of service or employment become : 5 a. Become a lobbyist. 6 b. Directly authorize or permit lobbying by another 7 individual as part of the personâs employment. 8 Sec. 2. Section 68B.7, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 1. A person who has served as an official, state employee of 11 a state agency, member of the general assembly, or legislative 12 employee shall not do any of the following within a period of 13 two years after the termination of such service or employment : 14 a. Obtain employment in which the person will take direct 15 advantage, unavailable to others, or receive compensation 16 for any services rendered on behalf of any person, firm, 17 corporation, or association in relation to any case, 18 proceeding, or application with respect to which the person 19 was directly concerned and personally participated during the 20 period of service or employment. 21 b. Be interested in a contract with this state or a 22 political subdivision of this state if, during the legislative 23 session in which the person ends service or employment, the 24 contract was authorized by an enacted law or order made by any 25 board of which the person was a member. 26 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 68B.9 State agency restrictions. 27 A state agency or local government agency shall not enter 28 into a contract with or take any action favorably selecting 29 any business or person represented by a person who served as 30 a statewide elected official, the executive or administrative 31 head of an agency of state government, the deputy executive 32 or administrative head of an agency of state government, or a 33 member of the general assembly within the preceding year if the 34 value of the contract or action is over one thousand dollars 35 -1- LSB 1174XS (4) 91 th/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 437 and the contract is a direct result of an official act by the 1 person. 2 Sec. 4. Section 68B.34, Code 2025, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 68B.34 Additional penalty. 5 In addition to any penalty contained in any other provision 6 of law, a person who knowingly and intentionally violates a 7 provision of sections 68B.2A through 68B.8 68B.9 , sections 8 68B.22 through 68B.24 , or sections 68B.35 through 68B.38 9 is guilty of a serious misdemeanor and may be reprimanded, 10 suspended, or dismissed from the personâs position or otherwise 11 sanctioned. 12